California statutes. Penal Code
 evidence that tends to show a violation of Section 23140, 23152, or 23153 of the Vehicle Code and the person from whom the sample is being sought has refused an officer’s request to submit to, or has failed to complete, a blood test as required by Section 23612 of the Vehicle Code, and the sample will be drawn from the person in a reasonable, medically approved manner. This paragraph is not intended to abrogate a court’s mandate to determine the propriety of the issuance of a search warrant on a case-by-case basis.

(14) Beginning January 1, 2016, the property or things to be seized are firearms or ammunition or both that are owned by, in the possession of, or in the custody or control of a person who is the subject of a gun violence restraining order that has been issued pursuant to Division 3.2 (commencing with Section 18100) of Title 2 of Part 6, if a prohibited firearm or ammunition or both is possessed, owned, in the custody of, or
 controlled by a person against whom a gun violence restraining order has been issued, the person has been lawfully served with that order, and the person has failed to relinquish the firearm as required by law.

(15) Beginning January 1, 2018, the property or things to be seized include a firearm that is owned by, or in the possession of, or in the custody or control of, a person who is subject to the prohibitions regarding firearms pursuant to Section 29800, 29805, 29815, 29820, or 29825, and the court has made a finding pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 29810 that the person has failed to relinquish the firearm as required by law.

(16) When the property or things to be seized are controlled substances or a device, contrivance, instrument, or paraphernalia used for unlawfully using or administering a controlled substance pursuant to the authority described in Section 11472 of
 the Health and Safety Code.

(17) (A) When all of the following apply:

(i) A sample of the blood of a person constitutes evidence that tends to show a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of Section 655 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(ii) The person from whom the sample is being sought has refused an officer’s request to submit to, or has failed to complete, a blood test as required by Section 655.1 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(iii) The sample will be drawn from the person in a reasonable, medically approved manner.

(B) This paragraph is not intended to abrogate a court’s mandate to determine the propriety of the issuance of a search warrant
 on a case-by-case basis.

(18) When the property or things to be seized consists of evidence that tends to show that a violation of paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (j) of Section 647 has occurred or is occurring.

(19) (A) When the property or things to be seized are data, from a recording device installed by the manufacturer of a motor vehicle, that constitutes evidence that tends to show the commission of a felony or misdemeanor offense involving a motor vehicle, resulting in death or serious bodily injury to a person. The data accessed by a warrant pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed the scope of the data that is directly related to the offense for which the warrant is issued.

(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, “recording device” has the same meaning as defined in
 subdivision (b) of Section 9951 of the Vehicle Code. The scope of the data accessible by a warrant issued pursuant to this paragraph shall be limited to the information described in subdivision (b) of Section 9951 of the Vehicle Code.

(C) For the purposes of this paragraph, “serious bodily injury” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 243.

(20) When the property or things to be seized consists of evidence that tends to show that a violation of Section 647.9 has occurred or is occurring. Evidence to be seized pursuant to this paragraph shall be limited to evidence of a violation of Section 647.9 and shall not include evidence of a violation of a departmental rule or guideline that is not a public offense under California law.

(21) If the property to be seized includes
 ammunition and all of the following criteria are satisfied:

(A) The property is owned by, in the possession of, or in the custody or control of a person who is subject to the prohibition set forth in Section 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(B) The person has been lawfully served with the order required by Section 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) The person has failed to relinquish the ammunition as required by law.

(22) When the property or things to be seized include a firearm or ammunition or both that is owned by, or in the possession of, or in the custody or control of, a person who is subject to the prohibitions regarding firearms pursuant to Section 527.9 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the person has been lawfully served
 with that order, and the person has failed to relinquish the firearm or ammunition or both as required by law.

(b) The property, things, person, or persons described in subdivision (a) may be taken on the warrant from a place or from a person in whose possession the property or things may be.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or (b), a search warrant shall not be issued for documentary evidence in the possession or under the control of a person who is a lawyer as defined in Section 950 of the Evidence Code, a physician as defined in Section 990 of the Evidence Code, a psychotherapist as defined in Section 1010 of the Evidence Code, or a member of the clergy as defined in Section 1030 of the Evidence Code, and who is not reasonably suspected of engaging or having engaged in criminal activity related to the documentary evidence for which a warrant is requested unless the following
 procedure has been complied with:

(1) At the time of the issuance of the warrant, the court shall appoint a special master in accordance with subdivision (d) to accompany the person who will serve the warrant. Upon service of the warrant, the special master shall inform the party served of the specific items being sought and that the party shall have the opportunity to provide the items requested. If the party, in the judgment of the special master, fails to provide the items requested, the special master shall conduct a search for the items in the areas indicated in the search warrant.

(2) (A) If the party who has been served states that an item or items should not be disclosed, they shall be sealed by the special master and taken to court for a hearing.

(B) At the hearing, the party searched
 shall be entitled to raise an issue that may be raised pursuant to Section 1538.5 as well as a claim that the item or items are privileged, as provided by law. The hearing shall be held in the superior court. The court shall provide sufficient time for the parties to obtain counsel and make motions or present evidence. The hearing shall be held within three days of the service of the warrant unless the court makes a finding that the expedited hearing is impracticable. In that case, the matter shall be heard at the earliest possible time.

(C) If an item or items are taken to court for a hearing, a limitation of time prescribed in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 799) of Title 3 shall be tolled from the time of the seizure until the final conclusion of the hearing, including an associated writ or appellate proceedings.

(3) The warrant shall, whenever practicable, be served during
 normal business hours. In addition, the warrant shall be served upon a party who appears to have possession or control of the items sought. If, after reasonable efforts, the party serving the warrant is unable to locate the person, the special master shall seal and return to the court, for determination by the court, an item that appears to be privileged as provided by law.

(d) (1) As used in this section, a “special master” is an attorney who is a member in good standing of the California State Bar and who has been selected from a list of qualified attorneys that is maintained by the State Bar particularly for the purposes of conducting the searches described in this section. These attorneys shall serve without compensation. A special master shall be considered a public employee, and the governmental entity that caused the search warrant to be issued shall be considered the employer of the special master and the
 applicable public entity, for purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, relating to claims and actions against public entities and public employees. In selecting the special master, the court shall make every reasonable effort to ensure that the person selected has no relationship with any of the parties involved in the pending matter. Information obtained by the special master shall be confidential and may not be divulged except in direct response to inquiry by the court.

(2) In a case in which the magistrate determines that, after reasonable efforts have been made to obtain a special master, a special master is not available and would not be available within a reasonable period of time, the magistrate may direct the party seeking the order to conduct the search in the manner described in this section in lieu of the special master.

(e) A search conducted pursuant to this section by a special master may be conducted in a manner that permits the party serving the warrant or that party’s designee to accompany the special master as the special master conducts the search. However, that party or that party’s designee may not participate in the search nor shall they examine any of the items being searched by the special master except upon agreement of the party upon whom the warrant has been served.

(f) As used in this section, “documentary evidence” includes, but is not limited to, writings, documents, blueprints, drawings, photographs, computer printouts, microfilms, x-rays, files, diagrams, ledgers, books, tapes, audio and video recordings, films, and papers of any type or description.

(g) No warrant shall issue for an item or items described in Section 1070 of the Evidence Code.

(h) No warrant shall issue for an item or items that pertain to an investigation into a prohibited violation, as defined in Section 629.51.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, no claim of attorney work product as described in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 2018.010) of Title 4 of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be sustained where there is probable cause to believe that the lawyer is engaging or has engaged in criminal activity related to the documentary evidence for which a warrant is requested unless it is established at the hearing with respect to the documentary evidence seized under the warrant that the services of the lawyer were not sought or obtained to enable or aid anyone to commit or plan to commit a crime or a fraud.

(j) Nothing in this section is intended to limit an attorney’s ability to
 request an in-camera hearing pursuant to the holding of the Supreme Court of California in People v. Superior Court (Laff) (2001) 25 Cal.4th 703.

(k) In addition to any other circumstance permitting a magistrate to issue a warrant for a person or property in another county, when the property or things to be seized consist of any item or constitute evidence that tends to show a violation of Section 530.5, the magistrate may issue a warrant to search a person or property located in another county if the person whose identifying information was taken or used resides in the same county as the issuing court.

(l) This section does not create a cause of action against a foreign or California corporation, its officers, employees, agents, or other specified persons for providing location information.

(m) This section
 shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 544, Sec. 11.5) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 362, Sec. 1.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1524.1.

(a) The primary purpose of the testing and disclosure provided in this section is to benefit the victim of a crime by informing the victim whether the defendant is infected with HIV. It is also the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to protect the health of both victims of crime and those accused of committing a crime. This section does not authorize mandatory testing or disclosure of test results for the purpose of a charging decision by a prosecutor, and, except as specified in subdivisions (g) and (i), this section does not authorize breach of the confidentiality provisions contained in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 120975) of Part 4 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions
 of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 120975) of Part 4 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code, when a defendant has been charged by complaint, information, or indictment with a crime, or a minor is the subject of a petition filed in juvenile court alleging the commission of a crime, the court, at the request of the victim, may issue a search warrant for the purpose of testing the accused’s blood or oral mucosal transudate saliva with an HIV test, as defined in Section 120775 of the Health and Safety Code only under the following circumstances: when the court finds, upon the conclusion of the hearing described in paragraph (3), or when a preliminary hearing is not required to be held, that there is probable cause to believe that the accused committed the offense, and that there is probable cause to believe that blood, semen, or any other bodily fluid identified by the State Department of Public Health in appropriate regulations as capable of transmitting the human immunodeficiency virus has been
 transferred from the accused to the victim.

(2) Notwithstanding Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 120975) of Part 4 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code, when a defendant has been charged by complaint, information, or indictment with a crime under Section 220, 261, 261.5, 264.1, 266c, 269, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 289, or 289.5, or former Section 262 or 288a, or with an attempt to commit any of the offenses, and is the subject of a police report alleging the commission of a separate, uncharged offense that could be charged under Section 220, 261, 261.5, 264.1, 266c, 269, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 289, or 289.5, or former Section 262 or 288a, or of an attempt to commit any of the offenses, or a minor is the subject of a petition filed in juvenile court alleging the commission of a crime under Section 220, 261, 261.5, 264.1, 266c, 269, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 289, or 289.5, or former Section 262 or 288a, or of an attempt to commit any of the
 offenses, and is the subject of a police report alleging the commission of a separate, uncharged offense that could be charged under Section 220, 261, 261.5, 264.1, 266c, 269, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 289, or 289.5, or former Section 262 or 288a, or of an attempt to commit any of the offenses, the court, at the request of the victim of the uncharged offense, may issue a search warrant for the purpose of testing the accused’s blood or oral mucosal transudate saliva with an HIV test, as defined in Section 120775 of the Health and Safety Code only under the following circumstances: when the court finds that there is probable cause to believe that the accused committed the uncharged offense, and that there is probable cause to believe that blood, semen, or any other bodily fluid identified by the State Department of Public Health in appropriate regulations as capable of transmitting the human immunodeficiency virus has been transferred from the accused to the victim. As used in this paragraph, “Section 289.5”
 refers to the statute enacted by Chapter 293 of the Statutes of 1991, penetration by an unknown object.

(3) (A) Prior to the issuance of a search warrant pursuant to paragraph (1), the court, where applicable and at the conclusion of the preliminary examination if the defendant is ordered to answer pursuant to Section 872, shall conduct a hearing at which both the victim and the defendant have the right to be present. During the hearing, only affidavits, counter affidavits, and medical reports regarding the facts that support or rebut the issuance of a search warrant under paragraph (1) shall be admissible.

(B) Prior to the issuance of a search warrant pursuant to paragraph (2), the court, where applicable, shall conduct a hearing at which both the victim and the defendant are present. During the hearing, only affidavits, counter affidavits, and medical
 reports regarding the facts that support or rebut the issuance of a search warrant under paragraph (2) shall be admissible.

(4) A request for a probable cause hearing made by a victim under paragraph (2) shall be made before sentencing in the superior court, or before disposition on a petition in a juvenile court, of the criminal charge or charges filed against the defendant.

(c) (1) When the person has been charged by complaint, information, or indictment with a crime, or is the subject of a petition filed in a juvenile court alleging the commission of a crime, the prosecutor shall advise the victim of the right to make this request. To assist the victim of the crime to determine whether the victim should make this request, the prosecutor shall refer the victim to the local health officer for prerequest counseling to help that person understand the extent to
 which the particular circumstances of the crime may or may not have put the victim at risk of transmission of HIV from the accused, to ensure that the victim understands both the benefits and limitations of the current tests for HIV, to help the victim decide whether the victim wants to request that the accused be tested, and to help the victim decide whether the victim wants to be tested.

(2) The Department of Justice, in cooperation with the California District Attorneys Association, shall prepare a form to be used in providing victims with the notice required by paragraph (1).

(d) If the victim decides to request HIV testing of the accused, the victim shall request the issuance of a search warrant, as described in subdivision (b).

Neither the failure of a prosecutor to refer or advise the victim as provided in this subdivision, nor the
 failure or refusal by the victim to seek or obtain counseling, shall be considered by the court in ruling on the victim’s request.

(e) The local health officer shall make provision for administering all HIV tests ordered pursuant to subdivision (b).

(f) Any blood or oral mucosal transudate saliva tested pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be subjected to appropriate confirmatory tests to ensure accuracy of the first test results, and under no circumstances shall test results be transmitted to the victim or the accused unless any initially reactive test result has been confirmed by appropriate confirmatory tests for positive reactors.

(g) The local health officer shall have the responsibility for disclosing test results to the victim who requested the test and to the accused who was tested. However, positive test
 results shall not be disclosed to the victim or to the accused without also providing or offering professional counseling appropriate to the circumstances.

(h) The local health officer and victim shall comply with all laws and policies relating to medical confidentiality subject to the disclosure authorized by subdivisions (g) and (i). An individual who files a false report of sexual assault in order to obtain test result information pursuant to this section shall, in addition to any other liability under law, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 120980 of the Health and Safety Code. An individual as described in the preceding sentence who discloses test result information obtained pursuant to this section shall also be guilty of an additional misdemeanor punishable as provided for in subdivision (c) of Section 120980 of the Health and Safety Code for each separate disclosure of that information.

(i) A victim who receives information from the health officer pursuant to subdivision (g) may disclose the test results as the victim deems necessary to protect their health and safety or the health and safety of the victim’s family or sexual partner.

(j) A person transmitting test results or disclosing information pursuant to this section shall be immune from civil liability for any actions taken in compliance with this section.

(k) The results of any blood or oral mucosal transudate saliva tested pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be used in any criminal proceeding as evidence of either guilt or innocence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 55.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1524.2.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) The terms “electronic communication services” and “remote computing services” shall be construed in accordance with the Electronic Communications Privacy Act of 1986 in Chapter 121 (commencing with Section 2701) of Part I of Title 18 of the United States Code. This section does not apply to corporations that do not provide those services to the general public.

(2) An “adverse result” occurs when notification of the existence of a search warrant results in:

(A) Danger to the life or physical safety of an individual.

(B) A flight from prosecution.

(C) The destruction of or tampering with evidence.

(D) The intimidation of potential witnesses.

(E) Serious jeopardy to an investigation or undue delay of a trial.

(3) “Applicant” refers to the peace officer to whom a search warrant is issued pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1528.

(4) “California corporation” refers to any corporation or other entity that is subject to Section 102 of the Corporations Code, excluding foreign corporations.

(5) “Foreign corporation” refers to any corporation that is qualified to do business in this
 state pursuant to Section 2105 of the Corporations Code.

(6) “Properly served” means that a search warrant has been delivered by hand, or in a manner reasonably allowing for proof of delivery if delivered by United States mail, overnight delivery service, or facsimile to a person or entity listed in Section 2110 of the Corporations Code, or any other means specified by the recipient of the search warrant, including email or submission via an internet web portal that the recipient has designated for the purpose of service of process.

(b) The following provisions apply to any search warrant issued pursuant to this chapter allowing a search for records that are in the actual or constructive possession of a foreign corporation that provides electronic communication services or remote computing services to the general public, where those records would reveal the identity of the
 customers using those services, data stored by, or on behalf of, the customer, the customer’s usage of those services, the recipient or destination of communications sent to or from those customers, or the content of those communications.

(1) When properly served with a search warrant issued by the California court, a foreign corporation subject to this section shall provide to the applicant, all records sought pursuant to that warrant within five business days of receipt, including those records maintained or located outside this state.

(2) If the applicant makes a showing and the magistrate finds that failure to produce records within less than five business days would cause an adverse result, the warrant may require production of records within less than five business days. A court may reasonably extend the time required for production of the records upon finding that the
 foreign corporation has shown good cause for that extension and that an extension of time would not cause an adverse result.

(3) A foreign corporation seeking to quash the warrant must seek relief from the court that issued the warrant within the time required for production of records pursuant to this section. The issuing court shall hear and decide that motion no later than five court days after the motion is filed.

(4) The foreign corporation shall verify the authenticity of records that it produces by providing an affidavit that complies with the requirements set forth in Section 1561 of the Evidence Code. Those records shall be admissible in evidence as set forth in Section 1562 of the Evidence Code.

(c) (1) A California corporation that provides electronic communication services or remote
 computing services to the general public, when served with a warrant issued by another state to produce records that would reveal the identity of the customers using those services, data stored by, or on behalf of, the customer, the customer’s usage of those services, the recipient or destination of communications sent to or from those customers, or the content of those communications, shall produce those records as if that warrant had been issued by a California court, but shall not produce records when the corporation knows or should know that the warrant relates to an investigation into, or enforcement of, a prohibited violation, as defined in Section 629.51.

(2) A California corporation shall not comply with subdivision (c) unless the warrant includes, or is accompanied by, an attestation that the evidence sought is not related to an investigation into, or enforcement of, a prohibited violation, as defined in Section 629.51.

(3) A California corporation served with a warrant described in paragraph (1) is entitled to rely on the representations made in an attestation described in paragraph (2) in determining whether the warrant relates to an investigation into, or enforcement of, a prohibited violation, as defined in Section 629.51.

(d) A cause of action shall not lie against any foreign or California corporation subject to this section, its officers, employees, agents, or other specified persons for providing records, information, facilities, or assistance in accordance with the terms of a warrant issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 627, Sec. 8.   (AB 1242)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1524.3.

(a) A provider of electronic communication service or remote computing service, as used in Chapter 121 (commencing with Section 2701) of Title 18 of the United States Code, shall disclose to a governmental prosecuting or investigating agency the name, address, local and long distance telephone toll billing records, telephone number or other subscriber number or identity, and length of service of a subscriber to or customer of that service, the types of services the subscriber or customer utilized, and the contents of communication originated by or addressed to the service provider when the governmental entity is granted a search warrant pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 1524.

(b) The search warrant shall be limited to only that information necessary to achieve the objective of the warrant, including by specifying the target individuals or accounts, the applications or services, the types of information, and the time periods covered, as appropriate.

(c) Information obtained through the execution of a search warrant pursuant to this section that is unrelated to the objective of the warrant shall be sealed and not be subject to further review without an order from the court.

(d) (1) A governmental entity receiving subscriber records or information under this section shall provide notice to a subscriber or customer upon receipt of the requested records. The notification
 may be delayed by the court, in increments of 90 days, upon a showing that there is reason to believe that notification of the existence of the search warrant may have an adverse result.

(2) An “adverse result” for purposes of paragraph (1) means any of the following:

(A) Endangering the life or physical safety of an individual.

(B) Flight from prosecution.

(C) Tampering or destruction of evidence.

(D) Intimidation of a potential witness.

(E) Otherwise seriously jeopardizing an investigation or unduly delaying a trial.

(e) Upon the expiration of the period of delay for the notification, the governmental entity shall, by regular mail or email, provide a copy of the process or request and a notice, to the subscriber or customer. The notice shall accomplish all of the following: 

(1) State the nature of the law enforcement inquiry with reasonable specificity.

(2) Inform the subscriber or customer that information maintained for the subscriber or customer by the service provider named in the process or request was supplied to or requested by the governmental entity, and the date upon which the information was supplied, and the request was made.

(3) Inform the subscriber or
 customer that notification to the subscriber or customer was delayed, and which court issued the order pursuant to which the notification was delayed.

(4) Provide a copy of the written inventory of the property that was taken that was provided to the court pursuant to Section 1537.

(f) A court issuing a search warrant pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 1524, on a motion made promptly by the service provider, may quash or modify the warrant if the information or records requested are unusually voluminous in nature or compliance with the warrant otherwise would cause an undue burden on the provider.

(g) A provider of wire or electronic communication services or a remote computing service, upon the
 request of a peace officer, shall take all necessary steps to preserve records and other evidence in its possession pending the issuance of a search warrant or a request in writing and an affidavit declaring an intent to file a warrant to the provider. Records shall be retained for a period of 90 days, which shall be extended for an additional 90-day period upon a renewed request by the peace officer.

(h) No cause of action shall be brought against any provider, its officers, employees, or agents for providing information, facilities, or assistance in good faith compliance with a search warrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 643, Sec. 2.   (AB 1310)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1524.4.

(a) This section applies to a service provider that is subject to the Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 1546)) and that operates in California. This section does not apply to a service provider that does not offer services to the general public.

(b) (1) Every service provider described in subdivision (a) shall maintain a law enforcement contact process that meets the criteria set forth in paragraph (2).

(2) Every service provider described in subdivision (a) shall ensure, at a minimum, that its law enforcement contact process meets all of the following
 criteria:

(A) Provides a specific contact mechanism for law enforcement personnel.

(B) Provides continual availability of the law enforcement contact process.

(C) Provides a method to provide status updates to a requesting law enforcement agency on a request for assistance.

(3) Every service provider described in subdivision (a) shall, by July 1, 2017, file a statement with the Attorney General describing the law enforcement contact process maintained pursuant to paragraph (1). If a service provider makes a material change to its law enforcement contact process, the service provider shall, as soon as practicable, file a statement with the Attorney General
 describing its new law enforcement contact process.

(c) The Attorney General shall consolidate the statements received pursuant to this section into one discrete record and regularly make that record available to local law enforcement agencies.

(d) The exclusive remedy for a violation of this section shall be an action brought by the Attorney General for injunctive relief. Nothing in this section shall limit remedies available for a violation of any other state or federal law.

(e) A statement filed or distributed pursuant to this section is confidential and shall not be disclosed pursuant to any state law, including, but not limited to, the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of
 Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 342.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

1525.

A search warrant cannot be issued but upon probable cause, supported by affidavit, naming or describing the person to be searched or searched for, and particularly describing the property, thing, or things and the place to be searched.

The application shall specify when applicable, that the place to be searched is in the possession or under the control of an attorney, physician, psychotherapist or clergyman.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1078, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1526.

(a) Before issuing the search warrant, the magistrate may examine on oath the person seeking the warrant and any witnesses the person may produce, and shall take his or her affidavit or their affidavits in writing, and cause the affidavit or affidavits to be subscribed by the party or parties making them. If the affiant transmits the proposed search warrant and all affidavits and supporting documents to the magistrate using facsimile transmission equipment, email, or computer server, the conditions in subdivision (c) apply.

(b) In lieu of the written affidavit required in subdivision (a), the magistrate may take an oral statement under oath if the oath is made under penalty of
 perjury and recorded and transcribed. The transcribed statement shall be deemed to be an affidavit for the purposes of this chapter. The recording of the sworn oral statement and the transcribed statement shall be certified by the magistrate receiving it and shall be filed with the clerk of the court. In the alternative, the sworn oral statement shall be recorded by a certified court reporter and the transcript of the statement shall be certified by the reporter, after which the magistrate receiving it shall certify the transcript which shall be filed with the clerk of the court.

(c) (1) The affiant shall sign under penalty of perjury his or her affidavit in support of probable cause for issuance of a search warrant. The affiant’s signature may be in the form of a digital signature or electronic signature if email or computer
 server is used for transmission to the magistrate.

(2) The magistrate shall verify that all the pages sent have been received, that all the pages are legible, and that the declarant’s signature, digital signature, or electronic signature is genuine.

(3) If the magistrate decides to issue the search warrant, he or she shall do both of the following:

(A) Sign the warrant. The magistrate’s signature may
 be in the form of a digital signature or electronic signature if email or computer server is used for transmission by the magistrate.

(B) Note on the warrant the date and time of the issuance of the warrant.

(4) The magistrate shall transmit via facsimile transmission equipment, email, or computer server the signed search warrant to the affiant. The search warrant signed by the magistrate and received by the affiant shall be deemed to be the original warrant. The original warrant and any affidavits or attachments in support thereof
 shall be returned as provided in Section 1534.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 176, Sec. 2.   (AB 2710)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1527.

The affidavit or affidavits must set forth the facts tending to establish the grounds of the application, or probable cause for believing that they exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1883.)
-------------------------------------------

1528.

(a) If the magistrate is thereupon satisfied of the existence of the grounds of the application, or that there is probable cause to believe their existence, he or she must issue a search warrant, signed by him or her with his or her name of office, to a peace officer in his or her county, commanding him or her forthwith to search the person or place named for the property or things or person or persons specified, and to retain the property or things in his or her custody subject to order of the court as provided by Section 1536.

(b) The magistrate may orally authorize a peace officer to sign the magistrate’s name on a duplicate original warrant. A duplicate original warrant shall be deemed to be a search warrant for the purposes of this chapter, and it shall be returned to the magistrate as provided for in Section 1537. The magistrate shall enter on the face of the original warrant the exact time of the issuance of the warrant and shall sign and file the original warrant and the duplicate original warrant with the clerk of the court as provided for in Section 1541.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1078, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1529.

The warrant shall be in substantially the following form:

County of ____.

The people of the State of California to any peace officer in the County of ____:

Proof, by affidavit, having been this day made before me by (naming every person whose affidavit has been taken), that (stating the grounds of the application, according to Section 1524, or, if the affidavit be not positive, that there is probable cause for believing that ____ stating
 the ground of the application in the same manner), you are therefore commanded, in the daytime (or at any time of the day or night, as the case may be, according to Section 1533), to make search on the person of C.D. (or in the house situated ____, describing it, or any other place to be searched, with reasonable particularity, as the case may be) for the following property, thing, things, or person: (describing the property, thing, things, or person with reasonable particularity); and, in the case of a thing or things or personal property, if you find the same or any part thereof, to bring the thing or things or personal property forthwith before me (or this court) at (stating the place).

Given under my hand, and dated this ____ day of ____, A.D. (year).

E.F., Judge of the (applicable) Court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1530.

A search warrant may in all cases be served by any of the officers mentioned in its directions, but by no other person, except in aid of the officer on his requiring it, he being present and acting in its execution.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1531.

The officer may break open any outer or inner door or window of a house, or any part of a house, or anything therein, to execute the warrant, if, after notice of his authority and purpose, he is refused admittance.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1532.

He may break open any outer or inner door or window of a house, for the purpose of liberating a person who, having entered to aid him in the execution of the warrant, is detained therein, or when necessary for his own liberation.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1533.
